Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202279-3106
Funding; legislative intent; report.

It is the intent of the Legislature that federal funds shall be used to implement the School Safety and Security Reporting System Act for fiscal years 2021-22, 2022-23, and 2023-24. The Commissioner of Education shall electronically report data, a cost-benefit analysis, and a funding recommendation regarding the continued viability of the Safe2HelpNE report line to the Appropriations Committee of the Legislature and the Education Committee of the Legislature on or before January 5, 2024.

Laws 2021, LB322, § 6.
July 1, 2021